Hawaii statutes.
[§302H-4] Facilities or transportation. When
fifteen or more qualified children in any one departmental school district wish
to enroll in the Hawaiian language medium education program, the superintendent
of education may provide facilities for a Hawaiian language medium education
program or provide transportation to the nearest schooling site providing the
program, including a charter school site or laboratory school site. [L 2004, c 133, pt of §2]

Law Journals and
Reviews

"Officially" What? The Legal Rights and
Implications of ‘Ōlelo Hawai‘i. 30 UH L. Rev. 243 (2007).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next